Utah statutes.
53B-18-1301.   Veterinary education program -- Partnership agreement.

(1)  With the approval of the State Board of Regents, Utah State University may enter into a partnership agreement with Washington State University to establish a veterinary education program.

(2)  The partnership agreement may provide that:

(a) (i)  initially, up to 20 Utah resident students and 10 nonresident students may be accepted each year into a four-year program leading to a doctorate in veterinary medicine; and

(ii)  if resources become available to expand the doctoral program in veterinary medicine, additional Utah resident students and nonresident students may be accepted into the program; and

(b)  students accepted into the doctoral program in veterinary medicine pursuant to Subsection (2)(a) complete the first and second years of study at Utah State University and the third and fourth years of study at Washington State University.

(3)  Subject to future budget constraints, the Legislature shall annually provide an appropriation to pay for the nonresident portion of tuition for Utah students enrolled at Washington State University under a partnership agreement authorized by this section for the third and fourth years of a doctoral program in veterinary medicine.



Enacted by Chapter 249, 2011 General Session

